District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

46-306.07

Contest of registration or enforcement.

Repealed.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 607, 42 DCR 6748
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(f)(7), 53 DCR 3634
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222
This section is referenced in § 46-306.06.
1981 Ed., § 30-346.7.
D.C. Law 16-137, in par. (a)(6), substituted “;” for “; or”; in par. (a)(7), deleted “(choice of law)” following “§ 46-306.04”, substituted “alleged arrearages” for “arrearages”, and substituted “; or” for a period; and added par. (a)(8).
Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 607 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).